California statutes. Insurance Code
  ARTICLE 6. Nonresidents [14070. - 14078.]

14070.

As used in this article, “presiding officer” means the executive officer of the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14071.

The acceptance by a nonresident licensee of any of the rights and privileges conferred upon him or her by this chapter, as evidenced by his or her performance within this state, either personally or through an employee, of any act for which a license is required by this chapter, is equivalent to the appointment by such licensee of the presiding officer as his or her true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all lawful process in any disciplinary proceeding conducted against him or her under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14072.

The acceptance of such rights and privileges as evidenced by such act shall signify the agreement of the licensee that any such process which is served against him or her in the manner provided in this article shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served upon him or her personally in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14073.

Service shall be made by leaving a copy of the accusation, together with a notice of defense and statement to respondent as described in Section 11505 of the Government Code, with a fee of two dollars ($2) for each licensee to be served, in the hands of the presiding officer or in his or her office in Sacramento. Such service shall be sufficient service on the licensee subject to compliance with Section 14074.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14074.

A notice of such service and a copy of the accusation, together with the notice of defense and statement to respondent, shall forthwith be sent by registered mail by the presiding officer to the licensee at his or her last known address as furnished by the commission. Personal service of such notice, copy of the accusation, notice of defense, and statement to respondent upon the licensee wherever found outside this state shall be the equivalent of such mailing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14075.

Proof of compliance with Section 14074 shall be made in the event of service by mail by affidavit of the presiding officer or his or her authorized employee showing such service by mailing, together with the return receipt of the United States post office bearing the signature of the licensee or his or her agent. Such affidavit and receipt shall be appended to the original accusation on file with the commissioner. In the event of personal service outside this state, such compliance may be proved by the return of any duly constituted public officer qualified to serve process in civil actions in the state or jurisdiction where the licensee is found, showing such service to have been made. Such return shall be appended to the original accusation on file with the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14076.

The commissioner, or if the proceeding is heard before a hearing officer of the Office of Administrative Hearings, such hearing officer, may order such postponements or continuances and grant such extensions of time as may be necessary to afford the licensee reasonable opportunity to defend the proceeding. In no event shall the licensee have less than 30 days after the date of service of the accusation in which to file a notice of defense, nor shall the notice of hearing provided for in Section 11509 of the Government Code or the notice and copy of affidavit referred to in Section 11514 of the Government Code be mailed or delivered less than 20 days prior to the date of hearing, and the time for making a request to cross-examine under Section 11514 of the Government Code shall not be less than 15 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14077.

The presiding officer shall keep a record of all process served upon him or her pursuant to this article, which record shall show the day and hour of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14078.

As used in this article, “nonresident” means a person who is not a resident of this state at the time of the performance of the act referred to in Section 14071.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Penal Provisions [14080. - 14080.]

14080.

Any person who knowingly falsifies the fingerprints or photographs submitted under subdivision (f) of Section 14024 is guilty of a felony. Any person who violates any of the other provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Crop Insurance Adjusters [14085. - 14085.]

14085.

(a) Upon application, the commissioner shall issue a crop insurance adjuster license to a person who meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Obtains an insurance adjuster license, with the exception of the examination requirement of Section 14026.

(2) Provides evidence that he or she has satisfactorily completed the loss adjustment training curriculum and competency testing required by the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation Standard Reinsurance Agreement.

(b) For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Crop insurance” means insurance provided by the private insurance market that indemnifies for damage to crops from unfavorable weather conditions, fire, lightning, flood, hail, insect infestation, disease, or other yield-reducing conditions or perils, and multiple peril crop insurance reinsured by the federal crop insurance corporation.

(2) “Crop insurance adjuster” means a person who investigates, negotiates, or settles crop insurance claims.

(c) A person shall not act as or purport to be a crop insurance adjuster unless licensed as a crop insurance adjuster.

(d) A person shall not contract, employ, or use any other person to adjust claims made under a crop insurance policy unless the other person is licensed as a crop insurance adjuster.

(e) All provisions of this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter shall apply to crop insurance adjusters, unless exempted by or in conflict with this article or the regulations adopted pursuant to this article.

(f) The commissioner may adopt regulations to implement this article, including, but not limited to, regulations that require applicants to satisfy other competency requirements in addition to or instead of those referred to in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and regulations that establish standards of practice for crop insurance adjusters.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 46.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Expiration and Renewal of Licenses and Cards [14090. - 14094.]

14090.

Every license, branch office certificate, and pocket card issued pursuant to this chapter shall expire on the day two years after the last calendar day of the month in which the initial license was issued. Licenses issued prior to January 1, 2011, shall expire on May 31 of each even-numbered year. To renew an unexpired license or certificate, the licensee shall, on or before the date on which it would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the commissioner, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter. On renewal, the evidence of renewal of the license or certificate as the commissioner may prescribe, and renewal pocket cards for the persons mentioned in Section 14034, shall be issued to the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 29.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14090.1.

(a) An individual who holds an insurance adjuster license and who is not exempt under subdivision (b) shall satisfactorily complete a minimum of 24 hours, of which three hours are to be in ethics, of continuing education courses pertinent to the duties and responsibilities of an insurance adjuster license reported to the insurance commissioner on a biennial basis in conjunction with his or her license renewal cycle.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A licensee not licensed for one full year prior to the end of the applicable continuing education biennium.

(2) A licensee holding a nonresident insurance adjuster license who has met the continuing education requirements of his or her designated resident state.

(3) An individual licensed as an insurance adjuster and as a property or casualty broker-agent, pursuant to Section 1625, who has met the continuing education requirements specified in Section 1749.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 28.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14090.2.

Notwithstanding Section 14090, the commissioner may establish license periods and renewal dates for all licenses issued pursuant to this chapter so as to distribute the renewal work to permit the most efficient and economical use of personnel and equipment. In such cases, to the extent practicable, provision shall be made for the proration or other adjustment of fees so that no person shall be required to pay more than that which he or she would have been required to pay had no change in license periods or renewal dates been made.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14090.1 by Stats. 2008, Ch. 300, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14091.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, an expired license or branch office certificate may be renewed at any time within one year after its expiration on the filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the commissioner, and the payment of the renewal fee in effect on the last preceding regular renewal date. The licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license or certificate shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 14090 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

Renewal of a license or certificate shall not prohibit the bringing of disciplinary proceedings for an act committed before the effective date of the renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 300, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14092.

A suspended license or branch office certificate is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but renewal of the license does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended, and renewal of the branch office certificate does not entitle the licensee, while the certificate remains suspended, and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity at the location for which the certificate was issued, or to engage in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the certificate was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14093.

A revoked license or branch office certificate is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.

A license or branch office certificate which is not renewed within one year after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter; and a license which expired before October 1, 1958, and was not reinstated before October 1, 1961, may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued.

The holder of the license or certificate may obtain a new license or certificate only on compliance with all of the provisions of this chapter relating to the issuance of an original license or certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 300, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Revenue [14097. - 14099.]

14097.

The amount of fees prescribed by this chapter, unless otherwise fixed, is that fixed in the following schedule:

(a) The application fee for an original license is seventy-two dollars ($72).

(b) The application fee for an original branch office certificate is forty-seven dollars ($47).

(c) The fee for an original license is an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the license is issued, except that, if the license will expire less than one year after its issuance, then the fee is an amount equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the last regular
 renewal date before the date on which the license is issued. The commissioner may, by appropriate regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of the initial license fee if the license is issued less than 45 days before the date on which it will expire.

(d) The renewal fee shall be fixed by the commissioner as follows:

(1) For a license as an insurance adjuster, not more than two hundred eighty-three dollars ($283).

(2) For a branch office certificate, not more than fifty-six dollars ($56).

(e) The application and license fee for classifications prescribed by the commissioner, in addition to those provided for in this chapter, and the application and license fees for a change in the type of business organization of a licensee, shall be in the amount
 prescribed by rule and regulation of the commissioner.

(f) The delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of expiration, but not more than seventy-two dollars ($72).

(g) The fee for reexamination of an applicant or his or her manager is twenty-nine dollars ($29).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 93.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14098.

The department shall receive and account for all money derived from the operation of this chapter and, at the end of each month, shall report such money to the Controller and shall pay it to the Treasurer, to the credit of the Insurance Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14099.

Application or license fee shall not be refunded except in accordance with Section 158 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Public Insurance Adjusters Act [15000. - 15062.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15000. - 15002.]

15000.

This chapter may be cited as the Public Insurance Adjusters Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15001.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Apprentice public insurance adjuster” means a person who is qualified in all respects as a public adjuster, except as to experience, education, or training.

(b) “Business entity” means a corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other legal entity.

(c) “Catastrophic disaster” means an event that results in large numbers of deaths and injuries; causes extensive damage or destruction of facilities that provide and sustain human needs; produces an overwhelming demand on state and local
 response resources and mechanisms; causes a severe long-term effect on general economic activity; and severely affects state, local, and private sector capabilities to begin and sustain response activities. A catastrophic disaster shall be declared by the President of the United States or the Governor of the state or district in which the disaster occurred.

(d) “Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Insurance.

(f) “Fingerprints” means an impression of the lines on the finger taken for the purposes of identification.

(g) “Home state” means the District of Columbia and any state or territory of the United States in which the public insurance adjuster’s principal place of residence or principal place of
 business is located. If neither the state in which the public insurance adjuster maintains the principal place of residence nor the state in which the public insurance adjuster maintains the principal place of business has a substantially similar law governing public insurance adjusters, the public insurance adjuster may declare another state in which it becomes licensed and acts as a public insurance adjuster to be the “home state.”

(h) “Licensee” means a person licensed under this chapter.

(i) “Person” includes any individual, firm, company, association, organization, partnership, limited liability company, and corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 4.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15002.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as entitling any person to practice law in this state, unless he or she is an active member of the State Bar of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [15003. - 15005.]

15003.

The commissioner may, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, appoint those inspectors, investigators, and other personnel as may be necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15004.

Every power and duty granted to or imposed upon the commissioner may be exercised by any other officer or employee of the department authorized by the commissioner, but the commissioner shall have the supervision of and the responsibility for all powers and duties exercised by those officers and employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15005.

The commissioner may adopt and enforce reasonable rules:

(a) Fixing the qualifications of licensees in addition to those prescribed in the chapter, necessary to promote and protect the public welfare.

(b) Carrying out generally the provisions of this chapter, including regulation of the conduct of licensees.

(c) For a change in the classification of a licensee, or in the type of business organization upon application therefore by a licensee, and to prescribe the fee, if any, to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regulation, Licensing, and Registration [15006. - 15032.]

15006.

(a) No person shall engage in a business regulated by this chapter, or act or assume to act as, or represent himself or herself to be, a licensee unless he or she is licensed under this chapter. Any person who violates this subdivision shall, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, be liable to the state for a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or if that violation is willful, in an amount not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The penalty shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought by the commissioner in a court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) Any contract for services regulated by this chapter that is entered into by an insured with any person who is in violation of subdivision (a) may be voided at the option of the insured, and the insured shall not be liable for the payment of any past services rendered, or future services to be rendered, by that person under that contract or otherwise.

(c) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person is engaging in acts or practices in violation of subdivision (a), the commissioner may, without any requirement of notice or hearing, issue and cause to be served upon that person an order requiring that person to cease and desist immediately from engaging further in those acts or practices.

(d) Any person who fails to comply fully with an order of the commissioner issued under subdivision (c) shall be liable to the state for a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each and every day that the violation or failure to comply continues, but in no event to exceed a maximum amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000). The commissioner shall collect the amount so payable and may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California to enforce collection. This penalty is in addition to any other penalties provided by law.

(e) The powers vested in the commissioner by this section are in addition to any and all other powers and remedies vested in the commissioner by law, and nothing herein shall be construed as requiring the commissioner to employ the powers conferred in this section instead of or as a condition precedent to the exercise of any other power or remedy vested in the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 600, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

15007.

A public insurance adjuster within the meaning of this chapter is a person who, for compensation, acts on behalf of or aids in any manner, an insured in negotiating for or effecting the settlement of a claim or claims for loss or damage under any policy of insurance covering real or personal property or any person who advertises, solicits business, or holds himself or herself out to the public as an adjuster of those claims and any person who, for compensation, investigates, settles, adjusts, advises, or assists an insured with reference to claims for those losses on behalf of any public insurance adjuster.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15008.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(a) An attorney at law admitted to practice in this state, when performing his or her duties as an attorney at law.

(b) Photographers, estimators, appraisers, engineers, and arbitrators, who are employed exclusively by a public insurance adjuster for the purpose of furnishing technical assistance to a licensed public insurance adjuster.

(c) A person who negotiates or settles claims arising under a life or health insurance policy or an annuity contract.

(d) A person who settles subrogation claims between
 insurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 5.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15009.

An application for a license under this chapter shall be on a form prescribed by the commissioner and accompanied by the application fee provided by this chapter. Every applicant for a license under this chapter shall comply with the provisions of Section 1703.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15009.1.

(a) The applicant shall complete a 20-hour prelicensing course of study for the lines of authority for a public insurance adjuster license.

(b) An applicant who resides in another state that does not license public insurance adjusters is eligible to designate California as his or her home state. He or she is required to complete the prelicensing education, pass the public insurance adjuster examination, and meet the license application requirements before a license can be issued.

(c) An applicant licensed as a public insurance adjuster in another state is exempt from completing a prelicensing education course to apply for a California public insurance adjuster license if, at the
 time of application, the applicant’s out-of-state license is current or was canceled within 90 calendar days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 6.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15010.

An application shall be verified and shall include all of the following:

(a) The full name and business address of the applicant.

(b) The name under which the applicant intends to do business.

(c) A statement as to the general nature of the business in which the applicant intends to engage.

(d) If the applicant is a person other than an individual, the full name and resident address of each of its partners, officers, and directors.

(e) Two photographs, not older than six months, of the
 applicant, of a type prescribed by the commissioner, and one classifiable set of his or her fingerprints, to be sent to a live scan fingerprint provider as directed by the department, if fingerprints are not submitted in person with a live scan fingerprinting service provider certified by the Department of Justice.

(f) A verified statement of his or her experience qualifications.

(g) Other information, evidence, statements, or documents as may be required by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 7.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15011.

Before an application for a license is granted, the applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Be at least 18 years of age.

(b) Shall not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 1668 or 1669.

(c) Shall have at least two years’ experience in the handling of loss claims under insurance contracts as determined by regulations adopted by the commissioner, and be competent to transact business and discharge the responsibilities of a public insurance adjuster in a manner as to safeguard the interests of the public. A person who has been licensed as an apprentice
 public insurance adjuster, as set forth in Section 15016, for 12 full months, shall be considered to have met the two-year experience requirement.

(d) Maintain an office in the State of California with public access during regular business hours.

(e) Pass an exam given by the commissioner in regard to property loss adjusting.

(f) Post a surety bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state in the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(g) For an organization applicant, designate a licensed individual public insurance adjuster to be responsible for the organization’s compliance with the insurance laws, rules, and regulations of this state.

(h) For an
 organization applicant, authorize only licensed individual public insurance adjusters to exercise authority under the organization’s license.

(i) Comply with any requirement to file supplementary documents, affidavits, and statements as may be necessary to obtain a full disclosure of the information that will aid the commissioner in determining whether the prerequisites for the license have been met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 8.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15012.

The license issued by the commissioner shall include, but not be limited to, adjusting claims for fire and allied coverages, burglary, flood, and all property claims both real and personal, and loss of income.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15013.

Each applicant for a license as a public insurance adjuster shall, prior to issuance of the license, personally take and pass, to the satisfaction of the commissioner, an examination given by the department as follows:

(a) The examination shall be prescribed by the commissioner and shall be of sufficient scope to reasonably test the applicant’s knowledge, among other things, of basic insurance theory, essential elements of contracts, technical competence in the handling of the various lines for which the applicant is being tested, claims ethics and knowledge of the Unfair Practices Act, and the duties and responsibilities of public insurance adjusters under the law.

(b) The
 examination shall be given to applicants under the supervision of the department or the department’s examination contractor and shall be in written form.

(c) The commissioner shall, within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 30 days, transmit the results of the examination and action taken on the application to the applicant.

(d) In the event an applicant who is otherwise qualified fails the examination, the commissioner may administer a reexamination.

(e) The examination shall be given at those times and places within the state as the commissioner deems reasonably necessary to serve the convenience of the department and applicants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 9.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15016.

(a) The apprentice public insurance adjuster license is a license to facilitate the training necessary to ensure reasonable competency to fulfill the responsibilities of a public insurance adjuster as defined in Section 15007.

(b) The apprentice public insurance adjuster license is subject to the following terms and conditions:

(1) The applicant shall submit, with an application for an initial apprentice public insurance adjuster license, an attestation or certification from a licensed public insurance adjuster assuming responsibility for all actions of that applicant.

(2) The apprentice public insurance adjuster is
 authorized to adjust claims only in California.

(3) The applicant is required to qualify under subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 15011.

(4) The applicant is required to pay a license fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

(5) The applicant is required to comply with any requirement to file supplementary documents, affidavits, and statements as may be necessary to obtain a full disclosure of the information that will aid the commissioner in determining whether the prerequisites for the license have been met.

(6) The apprentice public insurance adjuster shall not be required to take and successfully complete the prescribed public insurance adjuster examination.

(7) The licensee shall at all
 times be an employee of a public insurance adjuster and be subject to training, direction, and control by a licensed public insurance adjuster.

(8) The apprentice public insurance adjuster license is for a period not to exceed 12 months, and the license shall not be renewed.

(9) The licensee is restricted to participation in factual investigation, tentative closing, and solicitation of losses subject to the review and final determination of a licensed public insurance adjuster.

(10) The licensee shall be subject to suspension, revocation, or conditions in accordance with Section 1668.

(11) The applicant shall submit two photographs, not older than six months, of the applicant, of a type prescribed by the commissioner, and one classifiable set of his or
 her fingerprints, to be sent to a live scan fingerprint provider as directed by the department, if fingerprints are not submitted in person with a live scan fingerprinting service provider certified by the Department of Justice.

(12) The apprentice public insurance adjuster shall complete the 20-hour prelicensing education course of study as defined in Section 15009.1 during the license period.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 12.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15017.

(a) A nonresident license shall be issued by the commissioner to qualified persons who meet the requirements set forth in Section 15011, and who have appointed the commissioner as an agent for service of process in this state.

(b) Unless denied licensure pursuant to Sections 15018, 15018.5, and 15019, a nonresident person shall receive a nonresident public insurance adjuster license if all of the following apply:

(1) The person is currently licensed in good standing as a public insurance adjuster in his or her home state.

(2) The person has paid the fees required by Section 15060.

(3) The person has provided proof of financial responsibility as required by Section 15033.

(4) The individual has submitted to the commissioner the completed application for licensure.

(5) The person’s home state awards nonresident public insurance adjuster licenses to residents of California on the same basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 13.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15018.

After a hearing, the commissioner may deny a license unless the applicant makes a showing satisfactory to the commissioner that the applicant has not:

(a) Committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of license under Section 1668.

(b) Been refused a license under this chapter or had a license revoked.

(c) While unlicensed, committed, aided or abetted the commission of any acts for which a license is required in this chapter.

(d) Been convicted of any crime or wrongdoings in connection with this license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15018.5.

The commissioner may, without hearing, deny an application if the applicant has committed any act or been convicted of a crime constituting grounds for denial of license under Section 1669.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

15019.

Whenever a hearing is held under this chapter to determine whether an applicant for a license should be granted or to determine the qualifications of a licensee, the proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11501) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15020.

The form and content of the license shall be determined by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 14.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15021.

The license shall at all times be posted in a conspicuous place in the principal place of business of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15022.

Upon the issuance of a license, a pocket card of that size, design, and content as may be determined by the commissioner shall be issued without charge to each licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15023.

A license issued under this chapter is not assignable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15024.

Each licensee shall file with the commissioner the complete address of his or her principal place of business including the name and number of the street, or if the street where the business is located is not numbered, the number of the post office box. The commissioner may require the filing of other information for the purposes of indentifying that principal place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15025.

A licensee shall within 30 days of the change notify the department of any change of his or her address. The principal place of business may be at home or at a business address but it shall be the place at which the licensee maintains a permanent office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15026.

A licensee shall not advertise or conduct business from any location other than that shown on the records of the commissioner as his or her principal place of business unless he or she has received a branch office certificate for that location after compliance with the provisions of this chapter and those additional requirements necessary for the protection of the public as the commissioner may by regulation prescribe. A licensee shall notify the commissioner in writing within 10 days of closing or changing the location of a branch office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15027.

(a) A licensee shall not, directly or indirectly, act within this state as a public insurance adjuster without having first entered into a contract, in writing, on a form approved by the insurance commissioner and executed in duplicate by the public adjuster and the insured or a duly authorized representative. One original contract shall be kept on file by the licensee, available at all times for inspection, without notice, by the commissioner or his or her duly authorized representative, and one original contract shall be given to the insured.

(b) The written contract between the licensee and the insured shall contain each of the following:

(1) Title of “Public
 Adjuster Contract.”

(2) The name, business name, license number, telephone number, and address of the licensee.

(3) The name and address of the insured.

(4) A description of the loss and its location, if applicable.

(5) The name of the insurer and the policy number, if known.

(6) The full salary, fee, commission, or other consideration the licensee is to receive for services under the contract.

(7) A public adjuster’s fee, commission, or other valuable consideration shall not cause the insured to receive less than any amount paid to the insured by the insurer prior to the date of the written contract between the insured and
 the public adjuster.

(8) A description of the services to be provided to the insured.

(9) Signatures of the licensee and the insured.

(10) The date the contract was signed by the licensee and the date the contract was signed by the insured.
